src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Veps Noun inflection
* Metrical feet
	* Disyllables
		* pyrrhic, dibrach : kala
		* iamb	  	  : veneh
		* trochee, choree  : sanha sana+N+Sg+Ill
		* spondee	: landeh
	* Trisyllables
		* tribrach
		* dactyl
		* amphibrach
		* anapaest, antidactylus : venehed 
		* bacchius
		* antibacchius
		* cretic, amphimacer
		* molossus

The accusative singular has two forms, one is the same as the 
nominative singular in form and the other is identical to the 
genitive singular. This definition is dependent on the school
and its use should be associated with the user group, perhaps.

* Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm: Noun - marj examples:*
* *marj:* `marj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *marjan:* `marj+N+Sg+Gen`
* *[marj,* `marjan]:` (Eng. marj+N+Sg+Acc)
* *marjad:* `marj+N+Sg+Par`
* *marjaks:* `marj+N+Sg+Tra`
* *marjata:* `marj+N+Sg+Abe`
* *marjanke:* `marj+N+Sg+Com`
* *marjas:* `marj+N+Sg+Ine`
* *marjaspäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Ela`
* *marjaha:* `marj+N+Sg+Ill`
* *marjal:* `marj+N+Sg+Ade`
* *marjalpäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Abl`
* *marjale:* `marj+N+Sg+All`
* *marjan:* `marj+N+Sg+EssInst`
* *marjadme:* `marj+N+Sg+Prl`
* *marjanno:* `marj+N+Sg+Apr1`
* *marjannoks:* `marj+N+Sg+Apr2`
* *marjannopäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Egr`
* *marjahosai:* `marj+N+Sg+Ter1`
* *marjalesai:* `marj+N+Sg+Ter2`
* *marjassai:* `marj+N+Sg+Ter3`
* *marjahopäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Add1`
* *marjalepäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Add2`

* *marjad:* `marj+N+Pl+Nom`
* *[marjoid'en,* `marjoiden]` (Eng. # checking needed: marj+N+Pl+Gen)
* *marjad:* `marj+N+Pl+Acc`
* *marjoid:* `marj+N+Pl+Par`
* *marjoikš:* `marj+N+Pl+Tra`
* *marjoita:* `marj+N+Pl+Abe`
* *marjoidenke:* `marj+N+Pl+Com`
* *marjoiš:* `marj+N+Pl+Ine`
* *marjoišpäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Ela`
* *marjoihe:* `marj+N+Pl+Ill`
* *marjoil:* `marj+N+Pl+Ade`
* *marjoilpäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Abl`
* *marjoile:* `marj+N+Pl+All`
* *marjoin:* `marj+N+Pl+EssInst`
* *marjoidme:* `marj+N+Pl+Prl`
* *marjoidenno:* `marj+N+Pl+Apr1`
* *marjoidennoks:* `marj+N+Pl+Apr2`
* *marjoidennopäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Egr`
* *marjoihesai:* `marj+N+Pl+Ter1`
* *marjoilesai:* `marj+N+Pl+Ter2`
* *marjoihepäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Add1`
* *marjoilepäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Add2`

LEXICON N_NADO  nado:nado

## Nominals

* SG-NOM-SUF ; 

# ACTUAL CASES 

# Start Plural

# Possessor Indices

Not yet written...

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
